Massachusetts, session 194th, H977.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 20 of Chapter 21G shall be amended to insert the following: - Local
boards of health or other permitting bodies that oversee local permitting of wells in
municipalities shall provide annually by December 31st, a report of the below-threshold wells
permitted to the Department of Environmental Protection (DEP). Data should include, but not be
limited to: Location/address of well; primary use (i.e., residential, irrigation, commercial,
farming); and year of permit issuance.
SECTION 2. DEP shall use this data to estimate withdrawals from below-threshold wells
at a sub-basin scale. Estimated below threshold well withdrawals shall be included in estimates
of water withdrawals by basin and considered when DEP is issuing water withdrawal permits.
SECTION 3. Local Boards of Health or other appropriate local permitting authority shall
implement water conservation measures for these below-threshold wells during drought
of 2

consistent with the municipality’s current drought conditions and water use restrictions or in
identified flow depleted basins.
SECTION 4. Chapter 21G Section 4 shall be amended to strike the first sentence and
replace it with “The withdrawal volume threshold to be applied pursuant to sections five and
seven shall be twenty thousand gallons per day.”
of 2